Washington statutes.
RCW 7.88.005

Findings.

The legislature finds and declares that efforts by financial institutions to comply voluntarily with state and federal statutory and regulatory requirements are vital to the public interest; that possible discovery and use in civil litigation of work produced in connection with such voluntary compliance efforts has an undesirable chilling effect on the use, scope, and effectiveness of voluntary compliance efforts by financial institutions; and that the public interest in encouraging aggressive voluntary compliance review outweighs the value of this work product in civil litigation.

[ 1997 c 435 s 1.]